Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 27
KILLING STOCK - FENCING

Section

40-27-101. Owner driving stock on track.

If the owner of any stock drives any stock on the line of the track of any railway company or corporation, with intent to injure such company or corporation, and if said stock is killed or injured, the owner shall not receive any damages from the railroad company or corporation therefor, and shall be liable to such company or corporation for all damage such company or corporation may suffer in consequence of said act, and commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.; but nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any person from allowing his or her stock to pasture on the lands adjacent to the line of such railroads or to drive his or her stock over or across any such track at suitable times and places.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2573.

G.S.

§ 2808.

R.S. 08:

§ 5475.

C.L.

§ 2858.

CSA:

C. 139, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 887, § 75, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 853, § 147, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1559, § 360, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

40-27-102. Fence right-of-way - cattle guards.

Every railway company or corporation whose lines or roads, or any part thereof, are open for use, within six months after the lines of such railways or any part thereof are open, except at the crossings of public roads and highways and within the limits of incorporated towns and cities or the yard limits of established stations, shall erect and thereafter maintain fences on the sides of their roads, or the part thereof open to use, where the same pass through, along, or adjoining enclosed or cultivated fields or unenclosed lands, with openings and gates therein to be hung and have latches and hinges, so that they may be opened and shut at all necessary farm crossings of the road, for the use of the proprietors or owners of the land adjoining such railroad, and shall construct and maintain at all public road crossings good and sufficient cattle guards.

Such fences, gates, and cattle guards for the protection of livestock shall be constructed as defined in section 35-46-101 (1), C.R.S., and shall be amply sufficient to prevent horses, mules, asses, and cattle from getting on said railroads; and, so long as such fences and guards, or any part thereof, are not sufficient or not in sufficiently good repair to accomplish the objective for which they are intended, such railroad corporation shall be liable for any and all damages which are done by the agent, employees, engines, trains, or cars of any other corporation permitted and running over and upon their said railroad to any such cattle, horses, asses, or mules thereon. When such fences, gates, and guards have been built and duly made and are kept in good and sufficient repair, such railroad corporation shall not be liable for any such damages unless the same were occasioned by the negligence or carelessness of such railway company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof.

Where gates are constructed and maintained at farm crossings, opening into enclosed pastures or cultivated fields, it is the duty of the owner or occupant of such fields or pastures so provided with gates to see that such gates are kept closed at all times when not actually in use, and where it is shown that any such gate has been left open, the owner or occupant of such lands shall be held responsible for any stock killed or damaged because of such open gate.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 400, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2863.

CSA:

C. 139, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-2.

40-27-103. Liability for injury to stock.

Any railroad company running or operating its roads in this state and failing to fence on both sides thereof against livestock running at large at all points shall be absolutely liable to the owners of any such livestock killed, injured, or damaged by their agents, employees, engines, or cars or by the agents, employees, engines, or cars belonging to any other railroad company or corporation running over and upon such road.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 401, § 2.

C.L.

§ 2864.

CSA:

C. 139, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-3.

40-27-104. Compliance prima facie defense.

Any railway company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof whose road is enclosed with good and sufficient fences, gates, and cattle guards, as provided in section 40-27-102, capable of keeping such animals from being upon such road may plead and prove the same as a defense to any action under sections 40-27-102 to 40-27-113 for any killing, damaging, or injury to such animals occurring within such enclosure; but such plea or fact shall not be held to preclude the owner or his agent from showing that such killing, damage, or injury was caused by the negligence or carelessness of such railway company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof, for the purpose of showing liability notwithstanding such fencing.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 402, § 3.

C.L.

§ 2865.

CSA:

C. 139, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-4.

40-27-105. Burden of proof.

The killing or injury of any animal by a railway company or corporation shall be prima facie evidence of the negligence of said railway company or corporation, and every railway company or corporation in this state and every assignee or lessee thereof shall be liable to pay to the owner the full value of each animal killed and all damages to each animal injured by the engines or cars of such railway company or corporation in this state or the assignee or lessee thereof unless the railway company or corporation, by competent evidence, shall affirmatively show that such killing or wounding was not caused by the negligence of such railway company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof. On the trial of all actions for damages arising under this article, in order to admit evidence of absence of negligence, the defendants shall first be held to show a compliance with sections 40-27-102 to 40-27-113 in relation to the erection and maintenance of fences, gates, and cattle guards.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 402, § 4.

C.L.

§ 2866.

CSA:

C. 139, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-5.

40-27-106. Engineer to notify agent - inspection.

Whenever any cattle, sheep, horses, mules, or asses are killed or injured by any train, engine, or car upon any railway in this state, it is the duty of the engineer operating the engine, train, or car to notify the station agent at the first station at which the train stops after the killing or wounding or the superintendent or other proper official at the end of the division where the engineer's run ends. Should none of the employees of the train be aware of such killing or wounding, then it is the duty of any employee of the railway who becomes aware of such accident to notify the station agent at the nearest station to the point where the accident occurred.

It is the duty of the railroad company, through its station agent or such other official as may be designated, upon receipt of the information of the killing or wounding of any such livestock by any engine, train, or car, as soon as may be, to notify the section foreman upon whose section the accident occurred and also the nearest inspector of the state board of stock inspection commissioners.

It is the duty of the section foreman upon receiving the information to go to the point where the animal was killed or injured as soon as may be and there inspect the same, securing a full description of the animal together with any brands or marks that are upon the same and such other details as may serve to determine the ownership of such animal.

It is the duty of said stock inspector, as soon as may be after receiving said notice, to go to the point where the animal was killed or injured and there inspect the same, securing a full description of the animal together with any brands or marks that may be on the same and such other details as may serve to determine ownership of such animal. It is also the duty of the inspector to estimate as nearly as possible the probable value of said animal if killed or the amount of damages if injured.

Should the animal be so badly injured that it is in great suffering and cannot live or recover, it is the duty of either the stock inspector or the section foreman upon inspection to immediately kill the animal. If through any cause such an authorized inspector does not appear to inspect such animal so killed within thirty-six hours after such killing, it is the duty of the section foreman to remove the hide of said animal and preserve the same until it has been inspected by such inspector, and thereafter the carcass of such animal shall be disposed of by the railroad company, without prejudice to its rights, in such manner as it may determine.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 402, § 5.

C.L.

§ 2867.

CSA:

C. 139, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-6.

Cross references:

For the creation of a state board of stock inspection commissioners, see article 41 of title 35.

40-27-107. Reports of inspector and foreman.

After making such examination it is the duty of the stock inspector to immediately forward a report to the secretary of the state board of stock inspection commissioners showing all the facts in regard to the killing or wounding of said animal, together with a full description and the estimated value of same, and it is the duty of the foreman of the section to likewise make a similar report to the claim agent of said railroad company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 403, § 6.

C.L.

§ 2868.

CSA:

C. 139, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-7.

40-27-108. Notification of owner and claim agent.

Upon receipt of the information from any authorized stock inspector of the killing or wounding of any animal by any railroad company or by its engine, cars, or trains, it is the duty of the secretary of the state board of stock inspection commissioners to notify the owner of said animal so killed or injured, informing him of the facts and the estimated value placed upon said animal by the stock inspector, and he shall also send a copy of this report to the claim agent or other authorized official of the railway company responsible for said killing or injuring.

Should the secretary be unable to determine from the description furnished by the stock inspector the owner or probable owner of such animal so killed or injured, he shall cause an advertisement to be placed in a newspaper published in the county where said killing or wounding occurred, describing the animal so killed or injured, giving the marks or brands appearing on said animal, if any, and notifying the owner to appear within six months of the date of such killing or injuring and make claim for said animal. Said advertisement shall appear for two consecutive weeks. The cost of such advertisement shall be paid out of the brand inspection fund of the state board of stock inspection commissioners and shall be deducted from the amount of damages that may be awarded against the railway company or corporation. Should no claim be made for any animal so advertised, the cost of such advertising shall be paid by the railroad company responsible for such killing or injuring and shall be deposited in the brand inspection fund of said board.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 404, § 7.

C.L.

§ 2869.

CSA:

C. 139, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-8.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1007, § 4, effective August 7.

40-27-109. Proof of ownership and value.

The owner or duly authorized agent of the owner of any animal so killed or injured by any railway company within this state, within thirty days after notice of such killing or injuring, shall make proof that he was the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the animal so killed or injured or that he is the owner of the recorded brand found upon the animal so killed or damaged at the time of such killing or damaging, and said proof may be delivered to the secretary of the state board of stock inspection commissioners who shall notify said railway company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof and make demand that said railway company pay to the said state board of stock inspection commissioners for the benefit of the owner the estimated value of said animal if killed or the estimated amount of damages if injured, which shall be settlement in full of all claim for such damage. The secretary of the state board of stock inspection commissioners shall give a receipt in full of said money when received and shall deposit the same in the brand inspection fund of said board, and after paying any advertising charges that may be due against said amount, the balance shall be paid out on voucher to the owner or authorized agent of the owner entitled to receive same.

Should the owner or authorized agent of the owner of any such animal so killed or injured be dissatisfied with the estimated value placed upon such animal by the stock inspector, he may file with the said state board of stock inspection commissioners a claim for such amount of damage he thinks is justly due, and he has the right to produce such evidence in support of his claim as he may think necessary at any regular meeting of said board. Should the railroad company or corporation against whom such claim is made be dissatisfied with the estimated value placed upon any animal so killed or injured, it also has the right, through its claim agent or other authorized officer, to appear before the said state board of stock inspection commissioners at any regular meeting of said board and present such evidence as it may desire in support of its contention.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 404, § 8.

C.L.

§ 2870.

CSA:

C. 139, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-9.

40-27-110. Value of animal - finding of board.

Whenever any owner of any animal so killed or wounded or any railroad company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof submits any such claim for killing or damaging of livestock to the state board of stock inspection commissioners for determination as to what damage if any shall be paid by said railroad company, the finding of said state board of stock inspection commissioners in regard thereto shall be considered as an arbitration thereof. The finding of said board shall be final and shall also be so accepted by the said owner or his authorized agent or by said railroad company or corporation, and the state board of stock inspection commissioners shall have the right to make such investigation, through its inspectors or otherwise, as it may think necessary in order to determine the just and equitable amount that should be paid as damages or it may determine that no damages shall be paid, as the facts may warrant.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 405, § 9.

C.L.

§ 2871.

CSA:

C. 139, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-10.

40-27-111. Owner declining estimate.

Should any owner of any animal so killed or wounded by any railroad company decline to accept the estimated value of such animal or the estimated amount of such damage as fixed by the stock inspector or to submit the same to the arbitration of the said board, within six months he shall file sworn proof and affidavit of his claim with the station agent of such railroad company or corporation, and the railway company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof shall pay to such person delivering such demand the actual value of said animal if killed or the actual amount of damage if injured. If such claim for damages and such proof of ownership is not presented to the station agent of said railway company or corporation within six months of the date of such killing or injuring, it shall thereafter be forever barred.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 406, § 10.

C.L.

§ 2872.

CSA:

C. 139, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-11.

40-27-112. Time for payment and suit.

In case such railway company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof fails for thirty days after demand made therefor by the owner of any animal or his agent or attorney to pay such owner or his agent or attorney the value of said animal as claimed, then such owner, within six months from date of filing claim, may sue and recover the same from such railroad company or corporation or the assignee or lessee thereof in any court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which said animal was killed or injured, together with the legal interest thereon from the date such animal was killed or injured. Any person having a claim arising under the provisions of sections 40-27-102 to 40-27-113 may assign same in writing to any other claimant or person for value or for the purpose of suit, who shall thereupon have all the rights and remedies of the assignor; but, in case it becomes necessary on the part of any owner to establish claim for any animal so killed or injured in a court of competent jurisdiction, he shall have the right to establish the actual and market value of such animal or the actual damage so sustained.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 406, § 11.

C.L.

§ 2873.

CSA:

C. 139, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-12.

40-27-113. Evidence destroyed - penalty.

Any person who in any way conceals the evidence of the killing or wounding of any animal by any railroad train, engine, or cars on any railroad in this state or who in any way destroys or covers up the evidence that may lead to the identification of any animal so killed or injured commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 407, § 12.

C.L.

§ 2874.

CSA:

C. 139, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-13.

L. 63:

p. 340, § 57.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-13.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3298, § 703, effective March 1, 2022.

40-27-114. Care of animals injured.

Whenever any horse, cow, or other animal is injured by a train or otherwise on the right-of-way of any railroad company, it is the duty of trackwalkers, section men, brakemen, conductors, firefighters, engineers, and other employees of said company to care for such animal at once and report the facts to the nearest station agent and then notify the state board of stock inspection commissioners. It is the duty of the agent to give immediate notice, when possible, of the condition of such animal to the owner or the owner's agent whose duty it is forthwith upon receipt of notice to have such animal properly cared for. When immediate notice to the owner is not possible, it is the duty of the station agent to have such injured animal properly cared for without delay.

Source:

L. 05:

p. 286, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5497.

C.L.

§ 2875.

CSA:

C. 139, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-14.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1031, § 64, effective August 6.

40-27-115. Admission of liability - waiver of claim.

No act of the said railroad company, its employees or agent, or the owner of such injured animal shall be held to be an admission of liability or responsibility on the part of the said company for the injury of the said animal nor a waiver or relinquishment by said owner of any right or claim to damages from said company.

Source:

L. 05:

p. 286, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5498.

C.L.

§ 2876.

CSA:

C. 139, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 116-8-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-8-15.